Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Military Justice.
Sec. 26.05.890.
Sexual assault.

A member of the militia who commits any of the following acts is guilty of sexual assault and, except as provided under (f) of this section, shall be punished by separation with characterization dishonorable discharge and may, in addition to separation, be punished by up to 10 years of confinement and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct:

a sexual act on another person by

threatening or placing another person in fear;

causing bodily harm to another person;

making a fraudulent representation that the sexual act serves a professional purpose;

inducing a belief by any artifice, pretense, or concealment that the person is another person;

a sexual act on another person when the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is asleep, unconscious, or otherwise unaware that the sexual act is occurring;

a sexual act on another person when the other person is incapable of consenting to the sexual act because of

impairment by a drug, intoxicant, or other similar substance, and that condition is known or reasonably should be known by the person;

a mental disease or defect or physical disability, and that condition is known or reasonably should be known by the person.

A member of the militia who commits or causes sexual contact on or by another person, and in doing so would have violated (a) of this section had the sexual contact been a sexual act, is guilty of abusive sexual contact and may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

In a prosecution under this section, in proving that a person made a threat, it is not necessary to prove that the person actually intended to carry out the threat or had the ability to carry out the threat.

An accused may raise any applicable defenses available under this chapter or the Rules for Courts-Martial (Manual for Courts-Martial, United States, as amended). Marriage is not a defense for any conduct at issue in a prosecution under this section.

In a prosecution under this section where consent is at issue,

an expression of lack of consent through words or conduct means there is no consent; lack of verbal or physical resistance or submission resulting from the use of force, threat of force, or placing another person in fear may not constitute consent; a current or previous dating, social, or sexual relationship by itself or the manner of dress of the person involved with the accused in the conduct at issue may not constitute consent;

a sleeping, unconscious, or incompetent person cannot consent; a person cannot consent to force causing or likely to cause death or grievous bodily harm or to being rendered unconscious; a person cannot consent while under threat or fear or under the circumstances described in (a)(1)(C) or (D) of this section;

lack of consent may be inferred based on the circumstances of the offense; the surrounding circumstances shall be considered in determining whether a person gave consent, or whether a person did not resist or ceased to resist only because of another person’s actions.

The convening authority of the court-martial may reduce, commute, or suspend a sentence of separation with characterization dishonorable discharge imposed by a court-martial under (a) of this section to a sentence of separation with characterization bad-conduct discharge if, after sentencing and before the entry of judgment, the accused provides substantial assistance with the investigation or prosecution of another person.

When a person is convicted of an offense under this section that requires the person to register as a sex offender under AS 12.63, the court-martial shall provide the person with information regarding sex offender registration under AS

12.63.010

and, if it can be determined by the court-martial, inform the person whether the conviction will require the person to register for life or a lesser period under AS 12.63.

Unless otherwise specifically defined or unless the context otherwise requires, in this section,

“bodily harm” means any offensive touching of another person, however slight, including any nonconsensual sexual act or nonconsensual sexual contact;

“consent” means a freely given agreement to the conduct at issue by a competent person;

“force” means the use of a weapon, the use of physical strength or violence sufficient to overcome, restrain, or injure a person, or inflicting physical harm sufficient to coerce or compel submission by the victim;

“grievous bodily harm” means serious bodily injury, including fractured or dislocated bones, deep cuts, torn members of the body, serious damage to internal organs, and other severe bodily injuries; grievous bodily harm does not include minor injuries such as a black eye or a bloody nose;

“sexual act” means

contact between the penis and the vulva, anus, or mouth; in this subparagraph, contact involving the penis occurs upon penetration, however slight;

the penetration, however slight, of the vulva, anus, or mouth of another person by any part of the body or any object, with an intent to abuse, humiliate, harass, or degrade a person or to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of a person;

“sexual contact” means

touching, or causing another person to touch, either directly or through the clothing, the genitalia, anus, groin, breast, inner thigh, or buttocks of a person, with an intent to abuse, humiliate, or degrade a person;

touching, or causing another person to touch, either directly or through the clothing, a body part of a person, with an intent to arouse or gratify the sexual desire of a person; touching may be accomplished by any part of the body;

“threatening or placing another person in fear” means a communication or action that is of sufficient consequence to cause a reasonable fear that noncompliance will result in the victim or another person being subjected to the wrongful action contemplated by the communication or action.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am §§ 29, 30 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.620

; renumbered in 2016.

In 2020, subsections (f) – (h) were relettered to move definitions to the end of the section.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “, except as provided under (g) of this section, shall be punished by separation” for “may be punished by up to ten years of confinement, by separation” following “sexual assault and”, inserted “may, in addition to separation, be punished by up to 10 years of confinement and” following “dishonorable discharge and”, and made related and stylistic changes; added (g) and (h).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.893.
Prohibited sexual activities with military recruit or trainee by person in position of special trust.

A member of the militia who (1) is an officer, a noncommissioned officer, or a petty officer, (2) is in a training leadership position with respect to a specially protected junior member of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of the state, and (3) engages in prohibited sexual activity with the specially protected junior member of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of the state may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who is a military recruiter and engages in prohibited sexual activity with (1) an applicant for military service or (2) a specially protected junior member of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of the state who is enlisted under a delayed entry program may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

Consent is not a defense in a prosecution under this section.

When a person is convicted of an offense under this section that requires the person to register as a sex offender under AS 12.63, the court-martial shall provide the person with information regarding sex offender registration under AS

12.63.010

and, if it can be determined by the court-martial, inform the person whether the conviction will require the person to register for life or a lesser period under AS 12.63.

History.

(§ 31 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.895.
Stalking.

A member of the militia is guilty of stalking and may be punished by up to three years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the member

wrongfully engages in a course of conduct directed at a specific person that would cause a reasonable person to fear death or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to the person or a member of the person’s immediate family;

has knowledge, or should have knowledge, that the specific person will be placed in reasonable fear of death or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to the person or a member of the person’s immediate family;

induces in a specific person reasonable fear of death or bodily harm, including sexual assault, to the person or to a member of the person’s immediate family.

Unless otherwise specifically defined or unless the context otherwise requires, in this section,

“course of conduct” means a repeated maintenance of visual or physical proximity to a specific person or a repeated conveyance of verbal threats, written threats, or threats implied by conduct, or a combination of those threats, directed at or toward a specific person;

“immediate family” means a spouse, parent, child, or sibling of the person, or any other family member, relative, or intimate partner of the person who regularly resides in the household of the person or who, within the six months preceding the commencement of the course of conduct, regularly resided in the household of the person;

“repeated,” with respect to conduct, means two or more occasions of that conduct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.621; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.897.
Assault.

A member of the militia commits the offense of assault if the person attempts or offers to do bodily harm to another person using unlawful force or violence, whether or not the attempt or offer is consummated. A person who commits assault may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia commits the offense of aggravated assault if the person (1) uses a dangerous weapon or other means or force likely to produce death or grievous bodily harm to commit the offense described in (a) of this section or (2) commits the offense described in (a) of this section and intentionally inflicts grievous bodily harm, with or without a weapon, on another person. A person who commits aggravated assault may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 32 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.900.
Other sexual misconduct; indecent viewing, visual recording, or broadcasting.

A member of the militia who knowingly commits any of the following acts without legal justification or lawful authorization is guilty of an offense under this section and may be punished by up to seven years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct:

knowingly and wrongfully views the private area of another person, without the other person’s consent and under circumstances in which the other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy;

knowingly and wrongfully photographs, videotapes, films, or records, by any means, the private area of another person without the other person’s consent and under circumstances in which the other person has a reasonable expectation of privacy;

knowingly broadcasts a recording of another person’s private area that the person knows or reasonably should know was made or broadcast

without the other person’s consent; and

under circumstances in which the other person had a reasonable expectation of privacy;

knowingly distributes a recording of another person’s private area that the person knows or reasonably should know was made or distributed

without the other person’s consent; and

under circumstances in which the other person had a reasonable expectation of privacy.

A member of the militia who compels another person to engage in an act of prostitution with another person is guilty of forcible pandering and may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who intentionally exposes, in an indecent manner, the genitalia, anus, buttocks, or female areola or nipple is guilty of indecent exposure and may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

When a person is convicted of an offense under this section that requires the offender to register as a sex offender under AS 12.63, the court-martial shall provide the person with information regarding sex offender registration under AS

12.63.010

and, if it can be determined by the court-martial, inform the person whether the conviction will require the person to register for life or a lesser period under AS 12.63.

Unless otherwise specifically defined or unless the context otherwise requires, in this section,

“act of prostitution” means a sexual act or sexual contact as defined in AS

26.05.890

because of which anything of value is given to or received by another person;

“broadcast” means electronically transmitting a visual image with the intent that it be viewed by a person or persons;

“distribute” means delivering to the actual or constructive possession of another, including transmission by electronic means;

“indecent manner” means conduct that amounts to a form of immorality relating to sexual impurity that is grossly vulgar, obscene, and repugnant to common propriety and that tends to excite sexual desire or deprave morals with respect to sexual relations;

“private area” means the naked or underwear-clad genitalia, anus, buttocks, or female areola or nipple;

“reasonable expectation of privacy” means circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that the person could disrobe in privacy without being concerned that an image of a private area of the person was being captured or circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that a private area of the person would not be visible to the public;

“recording” means a still or moving visual image captured or recorded by any means;

“without the other person’s consent” has the meaning given to “without consent” in AS

11.41.470

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am §§ 33 — 35 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.622; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Subsection (d) and paragraphs (e)(7) and (8) were enacted as (e) and (d)(7) and (8) respectively; relettered in 2018 to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “seven years of confinement” for “one year of confinement” following “punished by up to”, rewrote (a)(3), which read, “knowingly and wrongfully broadcasts or distributes a recording that the person knows or reasonably should know was made under circumstances described in (2) of this subsection”; added (d)(7) and (8) [now (e)(7) and (8)]; added (e) [now (d)].

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.905.
Larceny and wrongful appropriation.

A member of the militia who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or another person any money, personal property, or article of value with intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of the property or to appropriate it for the person’s own use or the use of a person other than the owner steals that property and is guilty of larceny and may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or another person any money, personal property, or article of value with intent temporarily to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of the property or to appropriate it for the person’s own use or the use of a person other than the owner is guilty of wrongful appropriation and may be punished by up to six months of confinement, by separation with characterization up to a bad conduct discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.623; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.910.
Forgery.

A member of the militia who, with intent to defraud, (1) falsely makes or alters a signature to or a part of any writing that would, if genuine, apparently impose a legal liability on another person or change the legal right or liability of the person to their prejudice, or (2) utters, offers, issues, or transfers that writing, which the person knows to be falsely made or altered, is guilty of forgery and may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.624; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.913.
Public records offenses.

A member of the militia who (1) wilfully and unlawfully alters, conceals, removes, mutilates, obliterates, or destroys a public record or (2) takes a public record with the intent to alter, conceal, remove, mutilate, obliterate, or destroy the public record may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 36 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.915.
Making, drawing, or uttering check, draft, or order without sufficient funds.

A member of the militia who makes, draws, utters, or delivers a check, draft, or order for the payment of money on a bank or other depository, knowing at the time that the maker or drawer has not or will not have sufficient funds in, or credit with, the bank or other depository for the payment of that check, draft, or order in full on its presentment, with intent to defraud for the procurement of any article or thing of value or with intent to deceive for the payment of a past due obligation or for another purpose, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct. The making, drawing, uttering, or delivering by a maker or drawer of a check, draft, or order, payment of which is refused by the drawee because of insufficient funds of the maker or drawer in the drawee’s possession or control, is prima facie evidence of the person’s intent to defraud or deceive and of the knowledge of insufficient funds in, or credit with, that bank or other depository, unless the maker or drawer pays the holder the amount due within five days after receiving notice, orally or in writing, that the check, draft, or order was not paid on presentment. In this section, “credit” means an arrangement or understanding, express or implied, with the bank or other depository for the payment of that check, draft, or order.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.625

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.920.
Perjury.

A member of the militia who, in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice, under lawful oath or in another form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, wilfully and corruptly gives false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry, or who, in a declaration, certificate, verification, or statement under penalty of perjury, subscribes a false statement material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.631; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.925.
Fraud against the government.

A member of the militia is guilty of fraud against the government if the member,

knowing it to be false or fraudulent,

makes a claim against the United States, the state, or an officer of the United States or the state; or

presents to a person in the civil or military service of the United States, the state, or an officer of the United States or the state, for approval or payment, a claim against the United States, the state, or an officer of the United States or the state;

for the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of a claim against the United States, the state, or an officer of the United States or the state,

makes or uses a writing or other paper knowing it to contain a false or fraudulent statement;

makes an oath, affirmation or certification to a fact, writing, or other paper knowing the oath, affirmation, or certification to be false; or

forges or counterfeits a signature on a writing or other paper or uses the signature, knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

having charge, possession, custody, or control of money or other property of the United States or the state, that is furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state, knowingly delivers to a person having authority to receive it, any amount of the money or other property less than that for which the member receives a certificate or receipt; or

being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of property of the United States or the state, that is furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state, makes or delivers to a person the writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements contained in the writing and with intent to defraud the United States or the state.

A person found guilty of fraud against the government may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.632; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.930.
Conduct unbecoming an officer.

A commissioned officer, warrant officer, cadet, candidate, or midshipman of the militia who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer may be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.633; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.935.
General article.

Although not specifically mentioned in this chapter, all disorders and acts that prejudice good order and discipline in the militia of the state and all conduct of a nature to bring discredit on the militia of the state shall be considered by a court-martial and punished as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who commits an enumerated offense punishable under Article 134, 10 U.S.C. 934 (Uniform Code of Military Justice), except for those enumerated offenses relating to wrongful cohabitation, may, upon conviction, be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under (a) or (b) of this section.

When a person is convicted of an enumerated offense under (b) of this section that requires the offender to register as a sex offender under AS 12.63, the court-martial shall provide the person with information regarding sex offender registration under AS

12.63.010

and, if it can be determined by the court-martial, inform the person whether the conviction will require the person to register for life or a lesser period under AS 12.63.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 37 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.634; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (d).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.940.
Offenses concerning government computers.

A member of the militia who (1) knowingly accesses a government computer with an unauthorized purpose, (2) by accessing the government computer obtains classified information, and (3) with reason to believe the information could be used to the injury of the United States or to the advantage of any foreign nation, intentionally communicates, delivers, or transmits the information, or causes the information to be communicated, delivered, or transmitted, to any person who is not entitled to receive the information may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who intentionally accesses a government computer with an unauthorized purpose and by accessing the government computer obtains classified or other protected information from the government computer may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who knowingly causes the transmission of a program, information, code, or command and, as a result of that conduct, intentionally and without authorization causes damage to a government computer may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 38 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.945.
Breach of medical quarantine.

A member of the militia who is ordered into medical quarantine by a person authorized to issue the quarantine order and who, with knowledge of the quarantine order and the limits imposed under the quarantine order, goes beyond the limits imposed under the quarantine order before the person is released from quarantine by proper authority may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 38 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.